Connecticut, session 2026, HB05449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section and
2 sections 2 and 3 of this act:
3 (1) "Automated license plate reader system" means a mobile or fixed
4 electronic image recording device that is capable, in combination with
5 computer programs or algorithms, of converting images of license
6 plates or vehicle descriptors into computer-readable data;
7 (2) "Automated license plate reader data" includes any data captured,
8 recorded, stored, processed or derived from an automated license plate
9 reader system, including, but not limited to, license plate characters,
10 vehicle still or video images, vehicle attributes, location data, time
11 stamps and metadata;
12 (3) "Gender-affirming health care services" has the same meaning as
13 provided in section 52-571m of the general statutes;
14 (4) "Hotlist" means a list of registration numbers displayed on license
15 plates maintained for comparison against a registration number
16 obtained by an automated license plate reader system;
LCO 1 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
17 (5) "Law enforcement agency" means a department or agency for
18 which a law enforcement officer is an employee of or otherwise paid by
19 or acting as an agent of, including, but not limited to, a municipal police
20 department or the Division of State Police within the Department of
21 Emergency Services and Public Protection;
22 (6) "Public agency" has the same meaning as provided in section 1-
23 200 of the general statutes; and
24 (7) "Reproductive health care services" has the same meaning as
25 provided in section 52-571m of the general statutes.
26 (b) (1) On and after October 1, 2026, no public agency or law
27 enforcement agency may operate an automated license plate reader
28 system or use automated license plate reader data, except as follows:
29 (A) A public agency may operate an automated license plate reader
30 system or use automated license plate reader data for the following
31 purposes: (i) Performing weigh station duties; (ii) monitoring or
32 maintaining the agency's vehicles or equipment; (iii) assisting in the
33 control of access to a secured area; (iv) conducting traffic analytics; or
34 (v) enforcing traffic violations and collecting associated fines through
35 the use of work zone speed control systems, as defined in section 13a-
36 261 of the general statutes, and automated traffic enforcement safety
37 devices, as defined in section 14-307b of the general statutes; and
38 (B) A law enforcement agency may operate an automated license
39 plate reader system or use automated license plate reader data for the
40 following purposes: (i) Comparing such data with (I) data contained in
41 a hotlist, (II) records of the Connecticut Online Law Enforcement
42 Communications Teleprocessing System, (III) data contained in the
43 Federal Bureau of Investigations Kidnapping and Missing Persons list,
44 (IV) data contained in the Connecticut Criminal Justice Information
45 System, (V) data contained in the Federal Terrorist Screening Database,
46 (VI) data contained in the National Crime Information Center database,
47 or (VII) data contained in the National Center for Missing and Exploited
48 Children database; or (ii) entering a license plate number into an
LCO 2 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
49 automated license plate reader system upon a law enforcement officer's
50 determination that data in the system may (I) be relevant and material
51 to a specific active investigation of a criminal offense in which there is
52 reasonable suspicion that the offense has been or is being committed,
53 provided any access by an officer of automated license plate reader data
54 for such purpose shall result in a record of the factual basis for the access
55 and any associated case number for the complaint or incident that is
56 being investigated and is the basis for the access, (II) assist in the
57 apprehension of an individual with an outstanding felony warrant, (III)
58 assist in locating a missing or endangered individual, or (IV) assist in
59 the recovery of a stolen motor vehicle.
60 (2) Any automated license plate reader data collected or held by a
61 public agency or law enforcement agency shall not be retained for a
62 period in excess of thirty days, or for a shorter period when required
63 pursuant to the terms of a contract between a public agency or law
64 enforcement agency with a private vendor that accesses an automated
65 license plate reader system or stores such data, unless such data is being
66 retained (A) pursuant to a warrant or court order issued by a judge or
67 magistrate on behalf of the state or federal judicial branches, or pursuant
68 to court rules governing the preservation of evidence, (B) for the
69 purpose of collecting highway usage fees if such fees exist, provided
70 such data is deleted not later than thirty days following the collection of
71 such fees, or (C) as evidence in an active criminal investigation or
72 prosecution, provided (i) at the time such data is designated for
73 retention, such retention is approved by a supervisory law enforcement
74 officer and documented by the law enforcement agency in a record
75 stating the factual basis for such retention and any associated case
76 number for the investigation or prosecution to which the data relates,
77 and (ii) such data is deleted upon the conclusion of the investigation if
78 no criminal charges are filed, or upon the final disposition of the
79 criminal case to which the data relates, including the exhaustion of all
80 direct appeals, whichever occurs first, unless otherwise required to be
81 retained under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision. Any other access
82 to such data beyond an initial seven-day retention period, but prior to
LCO 3 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
83 the end of such thirty-day retention period, shall be upon the issuance
84 of a warrant by a judge or magistrate on behalf of the state or federal
85 judicial branches.
86 (c) On and after October 1, 2026, no public agency or law enforcement
87 agency operating an automated license plate reader system or using
88 automated license plate reader data pursuant to subsection (b) of this
89 section may:
90 (1) Use or assist in the use of automated license plate reader data to
91 monitor or investigate an individual based on such individual's actual
92 or perceived race, ethnicity, criminal history, sexual orientation, gender
93 identity or expression, sex, pregnancy status, disability, citizenship,
94 nationality or income level;
95 (2) Use or assist in the use of an automated license plate reader data
96 system or automated license plate reader data for the purpose of
97 identifying an individual engaged in an activity protected under the
98 First Amendment to the United States Constitution;
99 (3) Use or assist in the use of an automated license plate reader data
100 system or automated license plate reader data for the purpose of
101 investigating a suspected immigration violation or otherwise assisting
102 in any civil or criminal immigration enforcement activity;
103 (4) Use or assist in the use of an automated license plate reader data
104 system or automated license plate reader data for the purpose of
105 investigating or prosecuting any individual who has sought, received,
106 or provided reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
107 health care services;
108 (5) Unless authorized pursuant to section 29-6d of the general
109 statutes, collect automated license plate reader data on the premises or
110 within a distance established by the Police Officer Standards and
111 Training Council pursuant to section 2 of this act, of a reproductive or
112 sexual health facility, as defined in section 42-515 of the general statutes,
113 that primarily provides gender-affirming health care services or a
LCO 4 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
114 nonprofit or community organization that primarily serves immigrant
115 communities, excluding any property under federal jurisdiction,
116 provided such facility or organization notified the Police Officer
117 Standards and Training Council of such facility's or organization's
118 location;
119 (6) Share or provide access to automated license plate reader data,
120 unless the individual or entity requesting such data or access is (A) a
121 public agency or law enforcement agency of this state, (B) a law
122 enforcement agency of the state of New York or Rhode Island or the
123 Commonwealth of Massachusetts or a municipality of said states or
124 commonwealth or a multijurisdictional task force of which a public
125 agency or law enforcement agency of this state is a participating
126 member, provided (i) such requesting law enforcement agency or task
127 force provides a written declaration affirming that any data received
128 will be used in compliance with the prohibitions set forth in this section,
129 and will not be used for an immigration investigation or enforcement
130 action or to investigate or prosecute any individual who has sought,
131 received or provided reproductive health care services or gender-
132 affirming health care services and will not be further disclosed except as
133 permitted by law, and (ii) in the case of a multijurisdictional task force,
134 such specific data requested is approved by the head of such task force
135 or such head's designee and is directly and reasonably relevant to a
136 specific investigation of such task force, (C) any other law enforcement
137 agency other than those of this state or described in subparagraph (B) of
138 this subdivision, including any federal law enforcement agency, if such
139 requesting law enforcement agency has a judicially issued probable
140 cause warrant for the specific data requested, or is requesting specific
141 data on an individual identified as a possible match in the Federal
142 Terrorist Screening Database, or (D) is an individual requesting data
143 regarding a motor vehicle registered in such individual's name,
144 provided if a motor vehicle has more than one owner, lessor or regular
145 user, all such owners, lessors and regular users join in the request and
146 are natural persons;
147 (7) Participate in a system or network that shares automated license
LCO 5 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
148 plate reader data, or provide to, or access such data through any
149 multistate, intrastate, or national data-sharing system or network unless
150 such system or network requires, as a condition of participation in or
151 access to such system or network, execution of a written declaration by
152 each participant affirming that: (A) Any data obtained will be used
153 solely in compliance with this section and other laws of this state; and
154 (B) such participant will not share or use such data, except in compliance
155 with the provisions of this section; and
156 (8) Permit a public agency to have real-time, bulk or automatic access
157 to automated license plate reader data, unless such data is in response
158 to a documented, case-specific request and the sharing of such data is
159 not otherwise prohibited under this subsection.
160 (d) Automated license plate reader data shall not be disclosable under
161 the Freedom of Information Act pursuant to chapter 14 of the general
162 statutes. Any of the following information shall be disclosable pursuant
163 to said act:
164 (1) Locations of any still or video image recording device used as part
165 of an automated license plate reader system; and
166 (2) Any data, other than automated license plate reader data, derived
167 from any audit of an automated license plate reader system, usage logs
168 for such system and logs detailing access to automated license plate
169 reader data, provided any such data disclosable under this subsection
170 has all automated license plate reader data redacted from otherwise
171 disclosable data.
172 (e) Not later than January 1, 2027, a public agency, other than a law
173 enforcement agency, that operates an automated license plate reader
174 system or uses automated license plate reader data shall adopt and
175 publicize a written automated license plate reader system usage and
176 privacy policy prior to using or acquiring an automated license plate
177 reader system or automated license plate reader data. Such policy shall
178 comply with all applicable provisions of this section and include
179 safeguards and standards substantially equivalent to those required
LCO 6 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
180 under the model policy adopted under section 2 of this act.
181 (f) (1) On and after the effective date of this section, no public agency
182 or law enforcement agency may enter into any contract or agreement
183 with a private vendor that accesses an automated license plate reader
184 system or stores, processes, transmits or accesses automated license
185 plate reader data on behalf of the public agency or law enforcement
186 agency, for the purpose of selling, sharing, transferring, disseminating
187 or otherwise providing access to such data except as expressly
188 authorized by this section.
189 (2) On and after the effective date of this section, any contract or
190 agreement entered into between a public agency or law enforcement
191 agency and a private vendor for the purpose of the provision of services
192 associated with the use of an automated license plate reader system or
193 use or storage of automated license plate reader data shall expressly
194 require such vendor comply with the provisions of this section in the
195 same manner as such provisions are applicable to the contracting public
196 agency or law enforcement agency and shall expressly prohibit the
197 vendor from retaining, using or disclosing automated license plate
198 reader data for any purpose other than in fulfilling the vendor's
199 contractual obligations.
200 (3) Any vendor that entered into a contract or an agreement pursuant
201 to this subsection shall be considered an agent of the contracting public
202 agency or law enforcement agency for purposes of services provided
203 pursuant to the contract or agreement and shall be subject to the same
204 provisions of this section as are applicable to such public agency or law
205 enforcement agency.
206 (g) On and after October 1, 2026, a public agency or law enforcement
207 agency may be subject to an action by any aggrieved individual for
208 injunctive or declaratory relief, including a determination of past
209 violations, if an officer, employee or other individual otherwise paid by
210 or acting as an agent of such agency violates any provision of subsection
211 (b), (c) or (d) of this section. If the alleged violation that forms the basis
LCO 7 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
212 of an action under this subsection is committed by any vendor
213 contracting with a public agency or law enforcement agency, as
214 described in subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of this section, the vendor
215 shall be liable for such violation, not the law enforcement agency or
216 public agency. Such action may be brought in the superior court for the
217 judicial district in which the aggrieved individual resides. If an
218 aggrieved individual prevails and an order of injunctive relief is issued,
219 such aggrieved individual may be entitled to recover court costs and
220 reasonable attorney's fees associated only with an action or that portion
221 of an action concerning a request and order for injunctive relief. An
222 action under this subsection shall be privileged with respect to
223 assignment for trial.
224 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than December 1,
225 2026, the Police Officer Standards and Training Council shall adopt a
226 model policy governing law enforcement agency acquisition and use of
227 automated license plate reader systems and automated license plate
228 reader data. Such policy shall direct agencies to act in accordance with
229 section 1 of this act, including permissible and prohibited uses of such
230 system and any automated license plate reader data, whether derived
231 from such system or acquired in any other manner. In addition to
232 detailing such permissible and prohibited uses of such system or data,
233 such policy shall, at a minimum: (1) Develop standards for the use of a
234 hotlist, including the sources from which a hotlist may be compiled,
235 supervisory approval requirements for use and management of, access
236 to and validation procedures for the data on any hotlist, including time
237 limitations for the inclusion of such data on a hotlist, (2) provide for data
238 retention limits in accordance with subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of
239 section 1 of this act, (3) establish data access and sharing requirements
240 in accordance with subsection (c) of section 1 of this act, including
241 internal access controls and supervisory review and conditions under
242 which such data may be shared with other public agencies or law
243 enforcement agencies, (4) provide for a supervisory responsibility and
244 accountability structure, including designation of an officer or unit
245 responsible for oversight of automated license plate reader system use
LCO 8 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
246 and compliance with any policy adopted in accordance with the
247 provisions of this section, (5) establish training requirements, including
248 initial and periodic training for any officer or employee authorized to
249 access the system or data, (6) establish audit and logging requirements,
250 including the creation and retention of access logs sufficient to ensure
251 compliance and facilitate independent review, of which the logs shall
252 include documentation of access to and retention of automated license
253 plate reader data pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section
254 1 of this act, including, but not limited to, (A) the number of times such
255 data is retained, and (B) the duration of such retention, and require that
256 such audits be conducted not less than quarterly, (7) establish public
257 transparency standards and requirements, including publication of
258 agency-specific usage policies for an automated license plate reader
259 system and annual statistical reports detailing such usage, (8) establish
260 the distance described in subdivision (5) of subsection (c) of section 1 of
261 this act, and (9) contain provisions concerning compliance with
262 subsection (f) of section 1 of this act concerning contracting with
263 vendors for services associated with access to an automated license plate
264 reader system or storage of, processing of, transmission of or access to
265 automated license plate reader data.
266 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, each law enforcement agency shall
267 adopt and implement the policy developed pursuant to subsection (a)
268 of this section, or a policy that provides greater privacy protections than
269 that which are in the policy developed pursuant to said subsection (a).
270 Such policy shall be in effect until regulations are adopted pursuant to
271 this section, at which point such policy shall be supplanted by any such
272 regulation.
273 (c) (1) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Commissioner of Emergency
274 Services and Public Protection shall, in consultation with the Police
275 Officer Standards and Training Council, adopt regulations, in
276 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
277 enact a policy that at a minimum, satisfies the provisions of subdivisions
278 (1) to (9), inclusive, of subsection (a) of this section and section 1 of this
279 act.
LCO 9 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
280 (2) Not later than January 1, 2033, and at least once during each five-
281 year period thereafter, the commissioner shall, in consultation with the
282 Police Officer Standards and Training Council, adopt regulations in
283 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
284 Such regulations shall (A) comply with the provisions of this section and
285 section 1 of this act and shall not reduce or limit the protections afforded
286 by said sections or any minimum standards established by said sections,
287 and (B) be based on a consideration of any changes in law, technology
288 and best practices since the previous adoption of regulations pursuant
289 to this section.
290 (3) Any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall be binding
291 upon all law enforcement agencies.
292 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The Police Officer Standards
293 and Training Council, in consultation with the Commissioner of
294 Emergency Services and Public Protection and the Institute for
295 Municipal and Regional Policy at The University of Connecticut, shall
296 develop and promulgate a standardized form for reporting automated
297 license plate reader system usage, including, but not limited to, (1) the
298 number of (A) license plates scanned, (B) searches performed by the law
299 enforcement agency as a result of automated license plate reader system
300 use and the reason for any such search, (C) times automated license
301 plate reader data was shared with or accessed by another entity, the
302 identity of each of those entities and the reason for sharing the data, (D)
303 times automated license plate reader data was shared or accessed
304 pursuant to a judicial warrant, and (E) instances, if any, when data was
305 retained longer than permissible pursuant to subdivision (2) of
306 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act, and (2) any changes to the law
307 enforcement agency's data collection, retention or sharing policies that
308 affect privacy of automated license plate reader data.
309 (b) Each law enforcement agency shall, not later than January thirty-
310 first following a calendar year during which the law enforcement
311 agency used an automated license plate reader system pursuant to
312 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act, submit a report detailing such
LCO 10 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5449
313 usage to the Institute for Municipal and Regional Policy at The
314 University of Connecticut using the standardized form promulgated
315 pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and publish such report on the
316 law enforcement agency's Internet web site.
317 (c) Not later than January thirty-first of each year, any public agency,
318 other than a law enforcement agency, that uses an automated license
319 plate reader system pursuant to subsection (b) of section 1 of this act,
320 shall publish on the agency's Internet web site an annual report
321 containing the information described in subsection (a) of this section as
322 it pertains to such agency for the previous calendar year.
323 (d) Not later than July 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Institute
324 for Municipal and Regional Policy at The University of Connecticut
325 shall compile, analyze and summarize the reports submitted pursuant
326 to subparagraph (a) of this subsection and shall submit, in accordance
327 with section 11-4a of the general statutes, a consolidated report
328 regarding automated license plate reader system usage and any
329 recommendations for legislation to the Governor and the joint standing
330 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
331 relating to public safety and the judiciary.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Sec. 3 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3(a)(1)(B), "searches performed by the law enforcement
agency" was changed to "searches performed by the law enforcement
agency as a result of automated license plate reader system use" for
clarity.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 11 of 11